Indiana, session 2026, HB1338.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-1-22-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.10-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) and
(d), a physician or other practitioner may not knowingly provide gender
transition procedures to a minor.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a physician or other
practitioner may not aid or abet another physician or practitioner in the
provision of gender transition procedures to a minor. This section does
not prohibit a physician or other practitioner from:
(1) releasing a minor's health information to another
physician or other practitioner in the course of the receiving
practitioner's care of the minor; or
(2) discussing a minor's medical history with another
physician or other practitioner providing care to the minor.
(c) This section does not prohibit a physician or other practitioner
from providing any of the following to a minor:
(1) Services to individuals born with a medically verifiable
2026 IN 1338—LS 6435/DI 92


disorder of sex development, including an individual with
external biological sex characteristics that are irresolvably
ambiguous, including individuals born with forty-six (46) XX
chromosomes with virilization, born with forty-six (46) XY
chromosomes with undervirilization, or having both ovarian and
testicular tissue.
(2) Services provided when a physician or practitioner has
diagnosed a disorder of sexual development that the physician or
practitioner has determined through genetic or biochemical
testing that the individual does not have normal sex chromosome
structure, sex steroid hormone production, or sex steroid hormone
action.
(3) The treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or disorder that
has been caused by or exacerbated by the performance of gender
transition procedures.
(4) Any medical or surgical service undertaken because the
individual suffers from a physical disorder, physical injury, or
physical illness that would, as certified by a physician or
practitioner, place the individual in imminent danger of death or
impairment of major bodily function unless the medical or
surgical service is performed.
(d) A physician or practitioner within the practitioner's scope of
practice may continue to prescribe to an individual, who was taking a
gender transition hormone therapy on June 30, 2023, as part of a
gender transition procedure, gender transition hormone therapy until
December 31, 2023. This subsection expires January 1, 2024.
2026 IN 1338—LS 6435/DI 92